Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1088
School districts; uniform system of accounting; duty of State Department of Education to prescribe.

The State Department of Education shall prescribe a uniform system of accounting to which all public school districts in the State of Nebraska shall adhere.

Laws 1921, c. 59, § 1, p. 242;

C.S.1922, § 6546;

C.S.1929, § 79-2122;

R.S.1943, § 79-2131;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 179, p. 750;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,141;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 734.